Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB609.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 216B.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The provisions of this chapter that relate to the issuance of a certificate of
need shall not apply to:
1. Abortion facilities as defined in KRS 216B.015;
2. Any hospital which does not charge its patients for hospital services and
does not seek or accept Medicare, Medicaid, or other financial support
from the federal government or any state government;
3. Assisted living residences; family care homes; state veterans' nursing
homes;
4. Services provided on a contractual basis in a rural primary-care hospital
as provided under KRS 216.380;
5. Community mental health centers for services as defined in KRS
Chapter 210;
6. Primary care centers;
7. Rural health clinics;
8. Private duty nursing services operating as health care services agencies
as defined in KRS 216.718;
9. Group homes;
10. Licensed residential crisis stabilization units;
11. Licensed free-standing residential substance use disorder treatment
programs with sixteen (16) or fewer beds, but not including Levels I and
II psychiatric residential treatment facilities or licensed psychiatric
inpatient beds;
12. Outpatient behavioral health treatment, but not including partial
hospitalization programs;
Page 1 of 19
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 309
13. End stage renal disease dialysis facilities, freestanding or hospital based;
14. Swing beds;
15. Special clinics, including but not limited to wellness, weight loss, family
planning, disability determination, speech and hearing, counseling,
pulmonary care, and other clinics which only provide diagnostic
services with equipment not exceeding the major medical equipment
cost threshold and for which there are no review criteria in the state
health plan;
16. Nonclinically related expenditures;
17. Nursing home beds that shall be exclusively limited to on-campus
residents of a certified continuing care retirement community;
18. Home health services provided by a continuing care retirement
community to its on-campus residents;
19. The relocation of hospital administrative or outpatient services into
medical office buildings which are on or contiguous to the premises of
the hospital;
20. The relocation of acute care beds which occur among acute care
hospitals under common ownership and which are located in the same
area development district so long as there is no substantial change in
services and the relocation does not result in the establishment of a new
service at the receiving hospital for which a certificate of need is
required;
21. The redistribution of beds by licensure classification within an acute
care hospital so long as the redistribution does not increase the total
licensed bed capacity of the hospital;
22. Residential hospice facilities established by licensed hospice programs;
23. The following health services provided on site in an existing health
Page 2 of 19
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 309
facility when the cost is less than six hundred thousand dollars
($600,000) and the services are in place by December 30, 1991:
a. Psychiatric care where chemical dependency services are
provided;[,]
b. Level I[one (1)] and Level II[two (2)] of neonatal care; and[,]
c. Cardiac catheterization[,] and open heart surgery where cardiac
catheterization services are in place as of July 15, 1990; or
24. Ambulance services operating in accordance with subsection (6), (7), or
(8) of this section.
(b) The[These listed] facilities or services listed in paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall be subject to licensure, when applicable.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the licensure, supervision,
regulation, or control in any manner of:
(a) Private offices and clinics of physicians, dentists, and other practitioners of
the healing arts, except any physician's office that meets the criteria set forth
in KRS 216B.015(5) or that meets the definition of an ambulatory surgical
center as set out in KRS 216B.015;
(b) Office buildings built by or on behalf of a health facility for the exclusive use
of physicians, dentists, and other practitioners of the healing arts; unless the
physician's office meets the criteria set forth in KRS 216B.015(5), or unless
the physician's office is also an abortion facility as defined in KRS 216B.015,
except no capital expenditure or expenses relating to any such building shall
be chargeable to or reimbursable as a cost for providing inpatient services
offered by a health facility;
(c) Outpatient health facilities or health services that:
1. Do not provide services or hold patients in the facility after midnight;
and
Page 3 of 19
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 309
2. Are exempt from certificate of need and licensure under subsection (3)
of this section;
(d) Dispensaries and first-aid stations located within business or industrial
establishments maintained solely for the use of employees, if the facility does
not contain inpatient or resident beds for patients or employees who generally
remain in the facility for more than twenty-four (24) hours;
(e) Establishments, such as motels, hotels, and boarding houses, which provide
domiciliary and auxiliary commercial services, but do not provide any health
related services and boarding houses which are operated by persons
contracting with the United States Department of Veterans Affairs for
boarding services;
(f) The remedial care or treatment of residents or patients in any home or
institution conducted only for those who rely solely upon treatment by prayer
or spiritual means in accordance with the creed or tenets of any recognized
church or religious denomination and recognized by that church or
denomination; and
(g) On-duty police and fire department personnel assisting in emergency
situations by providing first aid or transportation when regular emergency
units licensed to provide first aid or transportation are unable to arrive at the
scene of an emergency situation within a reasonable time.
(3) The following outpatient categories of care shall be exempt from certificate of need
and licensure on July 14, 2018:
(a) Primary care centers;
(b) Special health clinics, unless the clinic provides pain management services
and is located off the campus of the hospital that has majority ownership
interest;
(c) Specialized medical technology services, unless providing a state health plan
Page 4 of 19
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 309
service;
(d) Retail-based health clinics and ambulatory care clinics that provide
nonemergency, noninvasive treatment of patients;
(e) Ambulatory care clinics treating minor illnesses and injuries;
(f) Mobile health services, unless providing a service in the state health plan;
(g) Rehabilitation agencies;
(h) Rural health clinics; and
(i) Off-campus, hospital-acquired physician practices.
(4) The exemptions established by subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall not
apply to the following categories of care:
(a) An ambulatory surgical center as defined by KRS 216B.015[(4)];
(b) A health facility or health service that provides one (1) of the following types
of services:
1. Cardiac catheterization;
2. Megavoltage radiation therapy;
3. Adult day health care;
4. Behavioral health services;
5. Chronic renal dialysis;
6. Birthing services; or
7. Emergency services above the level of treatment for minor illnesses or
injuries;
(c) A pain management facility as defined by KRS 218A.175[(1)];
(d) An abortion facility that requires licensure pursuant to KRS 216B.0431; or
(e) A health facility or health service that requests an expenditure that exceeds the
major medical expenditure minimum.
(5) An existing facility licensed as an intermediate care or nursing home shall notify
the cabinet of its intent to change to a nursing facility as defined in Pub. L.
Page 5 of 19
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 309
No.[Public Law] 100-203. A certificate of need shall not be required for conversion
of an intermediate care or nursing home to the nursing facility licensure category.
(6) Ambulance services owned and operated by a city government, which propose to
provide services in coterminous cities outside of the ambulance service's designated
geographic service area, shall not be required to obtain a certificate of need if the
governing body of the city in which the ambulance services are to be provided
enters into an agreement with the ambulance service to provide services in the city.
(7) Ambulance services owned by a hospital shall not be required to obtain a certificate
of need for the sole purpose of providing non-emergency and emergency transport
services originating from its hospital.
(8) (a) As used in this subsection, "emergency ambulance transport services" means
the transportation of an individual that has an emergency medical condition
with acute symptoms of sufficient severity that the absence of immediate
medical attention could reasonably be expected to place the individual's health
in serious jeopardy or result in the serious impairment or dysfunction of the
individual's bodily organs.
(b) A city or county government that has conducted a public hearing for the
purposes of demonstrating that an imperative need exists in the city or county
to provide emergency ambulance transport services within its jurisdictional
boundaries shall not be required to obtain a certificate of need for the city or
county to:
1. Directly provide emergency ambulance transport services as defined in
this subsection within the city's or county's jurisdictional boundaries; or
2. Enter into a contract with a hospital or hospitals within its jurisdiction,
or within an adjoining county if there are no hospitals located within the
county, for the provision of emergency ambulance transport services as
defined in this subsection within the city's or county's jurisdictional
Page 6 of 19
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 309
boundaries.
(c) Any license obtained under KRS Chapter 311A by a city or county for the
provision of ambulance services operating under a certificate of need
exclusion pursuant to this subsection shall be held exclusively by the city or
county government and shall not be transferrable to any other entity.
(d) Prior to obtaining the written agreement of a city, an ambulance service
operating under a county government certificate of need exclusion pursuant to
this subsection shall not provide emergency ambulance transport services
within the boundaries of any city that:
1. Possesses a certificate of need to provide emergency ambulance
services;
2. Has an agency or department thereof that holds a certificate of need to
provide emergency ambulance services; or
3. Is providing emergency ambulance transport services within its
jurisdictional boundaries pursuant to this subsection.
(9) (a) Except where a certificate of need is not required pursuant to subsection (6),
(7), or (8) of this section, the cabinet shall grant nonsubstantive review for a
certificate of need proposal to establish an ambulance service that is owned by
a:
1. City government;
2. County government; or
3. Hospital, in accordance with paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) A notice shall be sent by the cabinet to all cities and counties that a certificate
of need proposal to establish an ambulance service has been submitted by a
hospital. The legislative bodies of the cities and counties affected by the
hospital's certificate of need proposal shall provide a response to the cabinet
within thirty (30) days of receiving the notice. The failure of a city or county
Page 7 of 19
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 309
legislative body to respond to the notice shall be deemed to be support for the
proposal.
(c) An ambulance service established under this subsection shall not be
transferred to another entity that does not meet the requirements of paragraph
(a) of this subsection without first obtaining a substantive certificate of need.
(10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a continuing care retirement
community's nursing home beds shall not be certified as Medicaid eligible unless a
certificate of need has been issued authorizing applications for Medicaid
certification. The provisions of subsection (5) of this section notwithstanding, a
continuing care retirement community shall not change the level of care licensure
status of its beds without first obtaining a certificate of need.
(11) An ambulance service established under subsection (9) of this section shall not be
transferred to an entity that does not qualify under subsection (9) of this section
without first obtaining a substantive certificate of need.
(12) (a) The provisions of subsections (7), (8), and (9) of this section shall expire on
July 1, 2026.
(b) All actions taken by cities, counties, and hospitals, exemptions from obtaining
a certificate of need, and any certificate of need granted under subsections (7),
(8), and (9) of this section prior to July 1, 2026, shall remain in effect on and
after July 1, 2026.
Section 2. KRS 216B.095 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An applicant may waive the procedures for formal review of an application for a
certificate of need and request a nonsubstantive review as provided below. The
cabinet shall[may] grant or deny nonsubstantive review status within ten (10) days
of the date the application is deemed completed and shall give notice to all affected
persons of the decision to conduct a nonsubstantive review.
(2) Any affected person other than the applicant may request a hearing by filing a
Page 8 of 19
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 309
request with the cabinet within ten (10) days of the notice to conduct a
nonsubstantive review. As applicable, hearings shall be conducted as provided in
KRS 216B.085.
(3) [Based solely upon the record established with regard to the matter, ]The cabinet
shall approve or deny an application that has been granted nonsubstantive review
within thirty-five (35) days of the date that nonsubstantive review status was
granted[a certificate of need on all projects assigned nonsubstantive review status
within thirty-five (35) days of the determination of nonsubstantive review status. If
the application is denied nonsubstantive review status, it shall automatically be
placed in the formal review process].
(4)[(2)] If a certificate of need is denied following a nonsubstantive review, the
applicant may request that the application be placed in the next cycle of the formal
review process.
(5) Nothing in this section[subsection] shall require an applicant to pursue a formal
review before obtaining judicial review pursuant to KRS 216B.115.
(6)[(3)] The cabinet shall[may] grant nonsubstantive review status to an application
for a certificate of need which is required:
(a) To change the location of a proposed health facility;
(b) To replace or relocate a licensed health facility if:[,]
1. a. [If ]There is no substantial change in health services or substantial
change in bed capacity; and
b. The replacement or relocation is within the same county; or
2. The replacement or relocation is for a psychiatric residential treatment
facility;
(c) To replace or repair worn equipment if the worn equipment has been used by
the applicant in a health facility for five (5) years or more;
(d) For cost escalations;[ or]
Page 9 of 19
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 309
(e) To establish or expand a health facility or health service for which there is
not a component in the state health plan;
(f) To establish an ambulatory surgical center pursuant to the conditions
specified in subsection (10) of this section;
(g) To establish an ambulatory surgical center that:
1. Does not charge its patients and does not seek or accept:
a. Payment from any health insurance provider, including
Medicare and Medicaid; or
b. Financial support from the state or federal government; and
2. Utilizes the surgical facilities of an existing licensed ambulatory
surgical center during times the host ambulatory surgical center is not
in operation;
(h) To establish an industrial ambulance service;
(i) Prior to July 1, 2026, to establish an ambulance service in accordance with
subsection (9) of Section 1 of this Act;
(j) For a proposal made by a Level II psychiatric residential treatment facility;
(k) To establish an inpatient psychiatric unit in an existing licensed acute care
hospital under the following conditions:
1. The hospital is located in a county that has no existing, freestanding
psychiatric hospital;
2. The occupancy of acute care beds in the hospital is less than seventy
percent (70%) according to the most recent edition of the Kentucky
Annual Hospital Utilization and Services Report produced by the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
3. All of the proposed psychiatric beds are being converted from licensed
acute care beds;
4. No more than twenty percent (20%) of the hospital's acute care beds
Page 10 of 19
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 309
up to a maximum of twenty-five (25) beds will be converted to
psychiatric beds;
5. All of the psychiatric beds will be implemented on-site at the
applicant's existing licensed facility; and
6. All of the psychiatric beds will be dedicated exclusively to the
treatment of adult patients aged eighteen (18) to sixty-four (64);
(l) For a proposal made by a Kentucky licensed acute care hospital, critical
access hospital, or nursing facility to expand a home health service to
provide services exclusively to patients discharged from its facility who
require home health services at the time of discharge and no existing
licensed home health agency is available and willing to accept the referral;
(m) 1. For a proposal by a PACE program for a program that:
a. Has met the requirements of the state readiness review according
to a report submitted by the Department for Medicaid Services to
the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services;
b. Seeks to provide a health service directly to its members that is
not exempt from certificate of need under Section 1 of this Act;
and
c. Ensures that all services authorized under the PACE agreement
are provided exclusively to its members who reside within a
service area:
i. Located within the Commonwealth of Kentucky; and
ii. Approved by both the Department for Medicaid Services
and Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
2. As used in this paragraph, "PACE" has the same meaning as in KRS
216B.168;
(n) For a proposal to reestablish a licensed health care facility or service that
Page 11 of 19
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 309
was provided at a hospital and was voluntarily discontinued by the applicant
under the following circumstances:
1. The termination or voluntary closure of the hospital:
a. Was not the result of an order or directive by the cabinet,
governmental agency, judicial body, or other regulatory
authority;
b. Did not occur during or after an investigation by the cabinet,
governmental agency, or other regulatory authority;
c. Occurred while the facility was in substantial compliance with
applicable administrative regulations and was otherwise eligible
for relicensure; and
d. Was not an express condition of any subsequent certificate of
need approval;
2. The application to reestablish the health care facility or service that
was voluntarily discontinued is filed no more than one (1) year from
the date the hospital last provided the service that the applicant is
seeking to reestablish;
3. A proposed health care facility shall be located within the same county
as the former health care facility and at a single location; and
4. The application shall not seek to reestablish any type of bed utilized in
the care and treatment of patients for more than twenty-three (23)
consecutive hours;
(o) For a proposal that involves transferring acute care beds from one (1) or
more existing Kentucky-licensed hospitals to establish a new hospital under
the following circumstances:
1. The existing and new hospitals shall be under common ownership and
located in the same county;
Page 12 of 19
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 309
2. No more than fifty percent (50%) of the existing hospital's acute care
beds shall be transferred to the new facility; and
3. If the existing hospital:
a. Is a state university teaching hospital, the existing hospital
exceeded, by at least one (1), the minimum number of quality
measures required to receive supplemental university directed
payments from the state Medicaid program for the state fiscal
year preceding the date the application was filed; or
b. Is not a state university teaching hospital, the existing hospital's
overall star rating by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services Hospital Care Compare program was three (3) stars or
higher on the most recent annual update to the overall star
ratings preceding the date the application was filed; or
(p) In other circumstances the cabinet may prescribe by administrative
regulation[ may prescribe].
(7)[(4)] If an application is granted nonsubstantive review status, unless rebutted by
clear and convincing evidence submitted by an affected party, there shall be a
presumption that the facility or service is:
(a) Needed; and
(b) Consistent with the state health plan[Notwithstanding any other provision to
the contrary in this chapter, the cabinet may approve a certificate of need for a
project required for the purposes set out in subsection (3)(a) to (e) of this
section, unless it finds the facility or service with respect to which the capital
expenditure is proposed to be made is not required; or to the extent the facility
or services contemplated by the proposed capital expenditure is addressed in
the state health plan, the cabinet finds that the capital expenditure is not
consistent with the state health plan].
Page 13 of 19
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 309
(8)[(5)] The decision of the cabinet approving or denying a certificate of need
pursuant to this section shall be final for purposes of judicial appeal, unless the
applicant requests the application be placed in the formal review process. An
approved certificate shall be issued thirty (30) days after notice of the cabinet's
decision, unless a judicial appeal is taken and issuance is enjoined by the court.
(9)[(6)] Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the cabinet shall not grant
nonsubstantive review status to a certificate of need application that indicates an
intent to apply for Medicaid certification of nursing home beds within a continuing
care retirement community established under KRS 216B.015, 216B.020, 216B.330,
and 216B.332.
(10)[(7)] Notwithstanding any provision of state law or the state health plan
promulgated by administrative regulation in accordance with KRS 216B.040, the
cabinet shall grant nonsubstantive review for a certificate of need proposal to
establish an ambulatory surgical center if the applicant complies with the following:
(a) The applicant is an ambulatory surgical center that was organized and in
operation as the private office of a physician or physician group prior to
October 1, 2006;
(b) 1. The cabinet's general counsel has submitted a letter to the Accreditation
Association for Ambulatory Health Care advising that the cabinet does
not object to the applicant's parent company applying for and obtaining
Medicare certification; or
2. The applicant is an ambulatory surgical center that has received from the
cabinet a favorable advisory opinion dated June 14, 2005, confirming
that the applicant would be exempt from the certificate of need or
licensure requirement;
(c) The applicant's ambulatory surgical center has been inspected and accredited
by the Accreditation Association for Ambulatory Health Care since December
Page 14 of 19
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 309
31, 2006, and has maintained accreditation with that organization consistently
since that time; and
(d) The applicant was a party to litigation concerning the ambulatory surgical
center and physician office issue and, prior to July 12, 2012, obtained a Court
of Appeals ruling in its favor.
Section 3. KRS 216B.062 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Applications for certificates of need shall be submitted according to timetables
established by the cabinet by promulgation of administrative regulation, pursuant to
the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A. The application for a certificate of need shall
include the name and business address of any owner, investor, or stockholder in the
project whose ownership interest is greater than ten percent (10%). Once an
application has been deemed complete pursuant to the cabinet's administrative
regulations, notice shall be given as provided by the regulations of the beginning of
the review, the proposed review schedule, and the right to request a hearing. The
review shall be deemed to commence on the date of notice. No review shall take
longer than ninety (90) days from the commencement of the review unless the
applicant agrees to a deferral of action.
(2) The cabinet shall not batch applications proposing the same or similar types of
services, facilities, or equipment[Applications proposing the same or similar types
of services, facilities, or equipment shall be batched for review purposes, excluding
those granted nonsubstantive review status. The cabinet shall by promulgation of
administrative regulation under KRS Chapter 13A establish appropriate batching
groups to assure that applications for each type of service, facility, or equipment
will be eligible for consideration at set intervals. In each review batch, the cabinet
shall review and, if appropriate, compare all timely-filed applications proposing
similar types of services, facilities, or equipment in the same health service areas].
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
Page 15 of 19
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 309
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Health care system" means a for-profit, nonprofit, or university-affiliated
organization that owns and manages an existing licensed hospital within an
urban health care market;
(b) "Pilot program" means the program established under this section; and
(c) "Urban health care market" means a county:
1. With a population exceeding one hundred thousand (100,000) based
upon the most recent United States Census Bureau Annual Estimates
of the Resident Population for Counties; and
2. That has one (1) or more licensed hospitals within the county that
exceeded thirty thousand (30,000) inpatient days in the prior year,
according to the most recent edition of the Kentucky Annual Hospital
Utilization and Services Report produced by the Cabinet for Health
and Family Services.
(2) (a) The General Assembly finds and declares that health care consumers will
benefit from increased access to quality health care services in the state's
urban health care markets through reforms to certificate of need.
Furthermore, policymakers may utilize knowledge gained from a pilot
program in the state’s urban health care markets to inform future initiatives
to increase access to health care services throughout the Commonwealth.
(b) The cabinet shall establish a pilot program in Kentucky’s urban health care
markets to modernize requirements for a certificate of need.
(c) The pilot program shall begin on January 1, 2026, and end on December
31, 2029, unless otherwise extended or limited by the General Assembly.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary, the
following provisions shall apply under the pilot program:
Page 16 of 19
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 309
(a) In addition to exemptions in Section 1 of this Act, the following shall be
exempt from obtaining a certificate of need in an urban health care market:
1. Medical resonance imaging equipment;
2. Providers replacing worn equipment if the equipment has been used in
a health facility for three (3) years or more and it previously required
a certificate of need;
3. Ambulatory surgical centers solely dedicated to ophthalmological
services;
4. Megavoltage radiation therapy and PET equipment acquired by
existing licensed Kentucky hospitals with accredited cancer centers;
5. Personal care homes specializing in Alzheimer’s or dementia care;
6. Increases in the bed capacity of an existing licensed hospital up to ten
(10) beds or twenty percent (20%) of capacity, whichever is greater, in
any consecutive three (3) year period, in a hospital that has
maintained an overall occupancy of acute care beds in the facility at a
rate greater than eighty percent (80%) for the previous twelve (12)
month period; and
7. To change the location of a proposed health facility or to relocate a
licensed health facility if the change of location or relocation is within
the same county.
The facilities or services listed in this paragraph shall be subject to
licensure, when applicable;
(b) In addition to those facilities or services granted nonsubstantive review
status in Section 2 of this Act, the following shall be granted nonsubstantive
review status of an application for a certificate of need in an urban health
care market:
1. Establishing or expanding:
Page 17 of 19
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 309
a. Private duty nursing services to be provided solely within an
urban health care market;
b. Home health services to be provided solely within an urban
health care market;
c. Adult day care centers; and
d. Facilities specializing in the treatment of chemical dependency
or substance abuse disorders;
2. Increases in the bed capacity of an existing licensed hospital up to fifty
percent (50%) of capacity if:
a. The additional beds are utilized to establish a new hospital under
common ownership and within the same county;
b. The existing hospital has maintained an overall occupancy of
acute care beds at a rate greater than eighty percent (80%) for
the previous twelve (12) month period; and
c. There are a minimum of two (2) health care systems within the
county where the new hospital will be located; and
3. Ambulatory surgical centers dedicated solely to pain management.
The facilities or services listed in this paragraph shall be subject to
licensure, when applicable; and
(c) 1. a. An applicant listed under paragraph (b) of this subsection and
any affected person may submit written testimony, research, or
other materials for consideration to the cabinet within ten (10)
days of the notice to conduct a nonsubstantive review.
b. Upon request from the applicant, the cabinet shall provide the
applicant with a copy of any written testimony, research, or other
materials submitted to the cabinet by an affected person. The
applicant may provide a response to the cabinet within five (5)
Page 18 of 19
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 309
days of receiving them from the cabinet.
c. Only the applicant may request a hearing that shall be conducted
as provided in KRS 216B.085.
2. If a certificate of need is denied following a nonsubstantive review, the
applicant may:
a. Request that the application be placed in the next cycle of the
formal review process;
b. Request that the cabinet reconsider its decision pursuant to KRS
216B.090; or
c. Seek judicial review pursuant to KRS 216B.115.
3. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, only the applicant may
request an application to be placed in the formal review process,
request the cabinet to reconsider its decision, or seek judicial review.
(4) Upon the end of the pilot program, all facilities or services established in an
urban health care market under the pilot program shall retain:
(a) Any certificate of need granted during the pilot program; and
(b) Approval of all related investments approved during the pilot program.
(5) The cabinet shall submit a report on the progress of the pilot program by
November 1 year each of the pilot program to the Legislative Research
Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services.
(6) The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to implement this section.
Page 19 of 19
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed